Utah statutes.
53A-15-601.   Appropriation for program -- Program requirements -- Distribution of funds to school districts.

(1)  The Legislature shall provide an annual appropriation from the Uniform School Fund to the State Board of Education for a gang prevention and intervention program designed to help students at risk for gang involvement stay in school, enhance their self-esteem, and improve their intellectual and life skills.

(2)  The program shall:

(a)  provide independent gang prevention and intervention both inside and outside of school grounds when necessary, including:

(i)  meetings with gang members and other students whose activities negatively impact students in the program;

(ii)  intervening in situations involving gangs that impact students in the program or can result in violence;

(iii)  in-home visits with families of students in the program designed to encourage parents to become involved in their child's education; and

(iv)  notifying law enforcement personnel when a particular problem cannot be defused or when required by law; and

(b) maintaining required individual information including profiles on each student receiving direct services through the program, including:

(i)  attendance records;

(ii)  academic records; and

(iii)  extra-curricular activities.

(3)  The program coordinator at each school shall:

(a)  be on the school grounds during school hours;

(b)  have received training on gang prevention and intervention strategies in the schools;

(c)  have an understanding of the cultural backgrounds of gang members and at-risk students and be aware of the potential for gang involvement in all situations; and

(d)  have a minimum of one year's experience or on-site training in gang related issues inside the schools.

(4)  Individual schools within each school district interested in providing a gang prevention and intervention program shall apply to the school board for funds.

(5)  Individual schools shall be required to provide a percentage of the funding necessary for the program in their school, at least one-half of which must be provided through in-kind services.  In-kind services may not include office space and support.  Percentage requirements shall be as follows:

(a)  elementary schools, 12%;

(b)  middle, intermediate, or junior high schools, 18%;

(c)  high schools, 25%.

(6)  Individual schools receiving funds may provide the program to their students by contracting with a private entity whose program meets the requirements set out in Subsections (2) and (3).

